Utah statutes.
58-69-805.   Disclosure of financial interest by licensee.

(1)  Licensees under this chapter may not refer patients to any clinical laboratory or health care facility in which the licensee or a member of the licensee's immediate family has any financial relationship as that term is described in 42 U.S.C.  1395nn, unless the licensee at the time of making the referral discloses that relationship, in writing, to the patient.

(2)  The written disclosure under Subsection (1) shall also state the patient may choose any facility or laboratory for the work or treatment.



Enacted by Chapter 116, 1996 General Session

